Maryland, session 2025, SB0080.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF MARYLAND,
That the Laws of Maryland read as follows:
Article – Criminal Law
10–604.
(a) A person may not:
(1) overdrive or overload an animal;
(2) deprive an animal of necessary sustenance;
(3) inflict unnecessary suffering or pain on an animal;
(4) cause, procure, or authorize an act prohibited under item (1), (2), or (3)
of this subsection; or
(5) if the person has charge or custody of an animal, as owner or otherwise,
unnecessarily fail to provide the animal with:
(i) nutritious food in sufficient quantity;
– 1 –

Ch. 183 2025 LAWS OF MARYLAND
(ii) necessary veterinary care;
(iii) proper drink;
(iv) proper air;
(v) proper space;
(vi) proper shelter; or
(vii) proper protection from the weather.
(b) (1) A person who violates this section is guilty of a misdemeanor and on
conviction is subject to:
(I) FOR A VIOLATION THAT DOES NOT RESULT IN THE DEATH OF
AN ANIMAL OR THE NEED TO EUTHANIZE THE ANIMAL, imprisonment not exceeding 90
days or a fine not exceeding $1,000 or both; OR
(II) FOR A VIOLATION OF THIS SECTION THAT RESULTS IN THE
DEATH OF AN ANIMAL OR THE NEED TO EUTHANIZE THE ANIMAL BASED ON THE
RECOMMENDATION OF A LICENSED VETERINARIAN, IMPRISONMENT NOT
EXCEEDING 3 YEARS OR A FINE NOT EXCEEDING $5,000 OR BOTH, IF THE DECISION
TO EUTHANIZE THE ANIMAL IS VALIDATED, BEFORE OR AFTER THE EUTHANASIA OF
THE ANIMAL BY:
1. A SECOND LICENSED VETERINARIAN; OR
2. IF THE ANIMAL IS A LIVESTOCK OR AGRICULTURAL
ANIMAL, THE STATE VETERINARIAN.
(2) As a condition of sentencing OF A DEFENDANT CONVICTED OF
VIOLATING THIS SECTION, the court may:
(I) order [a] THE defendant [convicted of violating this section] to:
[(i)] 1. participate in and pay for psychological counseling; and
[(ii)] 2. pay, in addition to any other fines and costs, all reasonable
costs incurred in removing, housing, treating, or euthanizing an animal confiscated from
the defendant; AND
(II) PROHIBIT THE DEFENDANT FROM OWNING, POSSESSING, OR
RESIDING WITH AN ANIMAL FOR A PERIOD OF TIME DETERMINED BY THE COURT.
– 2 –

WES MOORE, Governor Ch. 183
(3) As a condition of probation, the court may prohibit a defendant from
owning, possessing, or residing with an animal FOR A PERIOD OF TIME DETERMINED BY
THE COURT.
10–604.1.
(A) A PERSON MAY NOT COMMIT A VIOLATION OF § 10–604 OF THIS
SUBTITLE THAT RESULTS IN:
(1) THE DEATH OF A DOMESTIC ANIMAL OR LIVESTOCK; OR
(2) THE NEED TO EUTHANIZE A DOMESTIC ANIMAL OR LIVESTOCK
BASED ON THE RECOMMENDATION OF A LICENSED VETERINARIAN, IF THE DECISION
TO EUTHANIZE THE DOMESTIC ANIMAL OR LIVESTOCK IS VALIDATED BEFORE OR
AFTER THE EUTHANASIA BY A SECOND LICENSED VETERINARIAN.
(B) A PERSON WHO VIOLATES THIS SECTION IS GUILTY OF A MISDEMEANOR
AND ON CONVICTION IS SUBJECT TO IMPRISONMENT NOT EXCEEDING 1 YEAR OR A
FINE NOT EXCEEDING $5,000 OR BOTH.
(C) AS A CONDITION OF SENTENCING OF A DEFENDANT CONVICTED OF
VIOLATING THIS SECTION, THE COURT MAY:
(1) ORDER THE DEFENDANT TO:
(I) PARTICIPATE IN AND PAY FOR PSYCHOLOGICAL
COUNSELING; AND
(II) PAY, IN ADDITION TO ANY OTHER FINES AND COSTS, ALL
REASONABLE COSTS INCURRED IN REMOVING, HOUSING, TREATING, OR
EUTHANIZING AN ANIMAL CONFISCATED FROM THE DEFENDANT; AND
(2) PROHIBIT THE DEFENDANT FROM OWNING, POSSESSING, OR
RESIDING WITH AN ANIMAL FOR A PERIOD OF TIME DETERMINED BY THE COURT.
SECTION 2. AND BE IT FURTHER ENACTED, That this Act shall take effect
October 1, 2025.
SECTION 2. AND BE IT FURTHER ENACTED, That this Act is an emergency
measure, is necessary for the immediate preservation of the public health or safety, has
been passed by a yea and nay vote supported by three–fifths of all the members elected to
each of the two Houses of the General Assembly, and shall take effect from the date it is
enacted.
– 3 –

Ch. 183 2025 LAWS OF MARYLAND
Approved by the Governor, April 22, 2025.
– 4 –